Illinois, session 104th, HB1026.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Capitol 5Security and Safety Act.  6    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 7changing Section 7.5 as follows: 8    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)9    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-724)10    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 11by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 12exempt from inspection and copying:13        (a) All information determined to be confidential 14    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 15    Development Act.16        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 17    library users with specific materials under the Library 18    Records Confidentiality Act.19        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 20    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 21    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 22    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation   HB1026- 2 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 2    has received.3        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 4    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 5    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 6    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 7    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 8    Infection Control Act.9        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 10    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.11        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 12    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 13    Qualifications Based Selection Act.14        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 15    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 16    Tuition Act.17        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 18    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 19    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 20    general's office that would be exempt if created or 21    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 22    that Act.23        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 24    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 25    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 26    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.  HB1026- 3 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 2    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 3    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.4        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 5    or driver identification information compiled by a law 6    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 7    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.8        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 9    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 10    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 11    Prevention Review Team Act.12        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 13    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 14    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 15    authorized under that Article.16        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 17    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 18    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 19    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 20    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 21    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 22    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.23        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 24    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 25    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.26        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans,   HB1026- 4 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 2    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 3    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 4    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 5    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 6    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 7    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 8    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 9    Act (repealed). 10        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 11    Personnel Record Review Act. 12        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 13    Illinois School Student Records Act. 14        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 15    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 16        (t) (Blank). 17        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 18    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 19    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 20        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 21    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 22    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 23    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 24    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 25    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 26    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed   HB1026- 5 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 2    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 3    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 4        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 5    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 6    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.7        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 8    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 9    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.10        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 11    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 12    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 13        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 14    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 15    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 16    information about the identity and administrative finding 17    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 18    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 19    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 20    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 21        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 22    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 23    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 24    Act. 25        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 26    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code.   HB1026- 6 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 2    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 3        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 4    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 5    authorized under that Act.6        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 7    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 8    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 9        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 10    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 11        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 12    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 13        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 14    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 15    Code. 16        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 17    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 18        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 19    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 20    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 21        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 22    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 23    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 24    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 25    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 26        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the   HB1026- 7 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 2        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 3    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 4    Aid Code. 5        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 6    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 7        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 8    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 9        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 10    arising out of a peer support counseling session 11    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 12    Suicide Prevention Act. 13        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 14    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 15    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 16    Prevention Act. 17        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 18    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 19    under the Reproductive Health Act. 20        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 21    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 22        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 23    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 24    Human Rights Act.25        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 26    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that   HB1026- 8 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    Act. 2        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 3    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 4        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 5    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 6    Public Aid Code. 7        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 8    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 9        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 10    information that shall not be made public under the 11    Illinois Insurance Code. 12        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 13    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.14        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 15    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 16        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 17    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 18        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 19    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 20    Police Act. 21        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 22    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 23    Administrative Code of Illinois. 24        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 25    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 26    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human   HB1026- 9 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 2        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 3    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 4    Violence Fatality Review Act. 5        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 6    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 7    July 1, 2025. 8        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 9    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 10    Agency Licensing Act. 11        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 12    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 13    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 14    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 15    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 16    Act. 17        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 18    the School Safety Drill Act. 19        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 20    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 21        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 22    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 23    Act. 24        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 25    2-3.196 of the School Code. 26        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed   HB1026- 10 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 2    Power Agency Act. 3        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 4    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 5    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 6        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 7    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 8    Act. 9        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 10    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 11    Act. 12        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 13    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 14        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 15    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 16    Transmission Modernization Act. 17        (sss) Recordings that are exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 5.1 of the Secretary of State Act. 19(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 20102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 218-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 22102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 236-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 24eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 25103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 267-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859,   HB1026- 11 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 2revised 10-10-24.) 3    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-724)4    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 5by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 6exempt from inspection and copying:7        (a) All information determined to be confidential 8    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 9    Development Act.10        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 11    library users with specific materials under the Library 12    Records Confidentiality Act.13        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 14    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 15    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 16    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 17    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 18    has received.19        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 20    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 21    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 22    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 23    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 24    Infection Control Act.25        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted   HB1026- 12 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.2        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 3    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 4    Qualifications Based Selection Act.5        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 6    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 7    Tuition Act.8        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 9    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 10    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 11    general's office that would be exempt if created or 12    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 13    that Act.14        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 15    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 16    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 17    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.18        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 19    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 20    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.21        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 22    or driver identification information compiled by a law 23    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 24    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.25        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 26    health care facility resident sexual assault and death   HB1026- 13 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 2    Prevention Review Team Act.3        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 4    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 5    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 6    authorized under that Article.7        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 8    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 9    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 10    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 11    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 12    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 13    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.14        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 15    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 16    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.17        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 18    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 19    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 20    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 21    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 22    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 23    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 24    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 25    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 26    Act (repealed).   HB1026- 14 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 2    Personnel Record Review Act. 3        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 4    Illinois School Student Records Act. 5        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 6    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 7        (t) (Blank). 8        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 9    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 10    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 11        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 12    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 13    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 14    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 15    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 16    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 17    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 18    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 19    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 20    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 21        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 22    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 23    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.24        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 25    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 26    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.  HB1026- 15 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 2    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 3    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 4        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 5    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 6    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 7    information about the identity and administrative finding 8    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 9    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 10    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 11    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 12        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 13    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 14    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 15    Act. 16        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 17    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 18        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 19    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 20        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 21    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 22    authorized under that Act.23        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 24    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 25    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 26        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure   HB1026- 16 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 2        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 3    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 4        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 5    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 6    Code. 7        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 8    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 9        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 10    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 11    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 12        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 13    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 14    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 15    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 16    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 17        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 18    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 19        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 20    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 21    Aid Code. 22        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 23    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 24        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 26        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports   HB1026- 17 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    arising out of a peer support counseling session 2    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 3    Suicide Prevention Act. 4        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 5    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 6    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 7    Prevention Act. 8        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 9    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 10    under the Reproductive Health Act. 11        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 12    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 13        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 14    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 15    Human Rights Act.16        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 17    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 18    Act. 19        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 20    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 21        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 22    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 23    Public Aid Code. 24        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 26        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or   HB1026- 18 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    information that shall not be made public under the 2    Illinois Insurance Code. 3        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 4    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.5        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 6    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 7        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 8    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 9        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 10    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 11    Police Act. 12        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 13    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 14    Administrative Code of Illinois. 15        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 16    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 17    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 18    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 19        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 20    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 21    Violence Fatality Review Act. 22        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 23    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 24    July 1, 2025. 25        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 26    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse   HB1026- 19 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    Agency Licensing Act. 2        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 3    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 4    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 5    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 6    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 7    Act. 8        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 9    the School Safety Drill Act. 10        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 11    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 12        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 13    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 14    Act. 15        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 16    2-3.196 of the School Code. 17        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 18    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 19    Power Agency Act. 20        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 21    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 22    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 23        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 24    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 25    Act. 26        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure   HB1026- 20 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 2    Act. 3        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 4    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 5        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 6    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 7    Transmission Modernization Act. 8        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 9    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.10        (ttt) Recordings that are exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 5.1 of the Secretary of State Act. 12(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 13102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 148-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 15102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 166-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 17eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 18103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 197-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 20eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 21103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 10-10-24.) 22    Section 10. The Secretary of State Act is amended by 23adding Section 5.1 as follows: 24    (15 ILCS 305/5.1 new)  HB1026- 21 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1    Sec. 5.1. Installation of security devices in State 2Capitol Complex.3    (a) The Office of the Secretary of State shall install and 4maintain electronic monitoring devices at each entrance to the 5State Capitol Complex and shall install and maintain safety 6call boxes around the State Capitol Complex.7    (b) Any video or audio recording created or maintained 8under this Section is exempt from disclosure under the Freedom 9of Information Act. 10    (c) As used in this Section: 11    "Electronic monitoring device" means a surveillance 12instrument with a fixed position video camera, an audio 13recording device, or both that records activity or sounds and 14transmits activity or sounds to the Secretary of State 15Department of Police.16    "Safety call box" means a well lit, publicly accessible 17call box that houses a telecommunication device that may be 18used by an individual who feels unsafe and who wishes to 19communicate with law enforcement authorities and alert those 20authorities of the individual's location. 21    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 22changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 23that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 24represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 25not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes   HB1026- 22 -LRB104 03403 SPS 13425 b1made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 2Public Act.